Missouri, session 2026, SB1366.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 110.240, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 110.240,
to read as follows:
110.240. 1. It is the duty of the county treasurer to
draw a check as county treasurer upon a county depositary in
favor of the legal holder thereof, and to charge the same to
the fund upon which it is drawn. No county treasurer shall
draw any check upon the funds in any depositary unless there
is sufficient money belonging to the fund upon which the
check is drawn to pay the same, and no money belonging to
the county shall be paid by any depositary except upon
checks of the county treasurer. In case any bonds, coupons
or other indebtedness of the county are payable by the terms
of the bonds, coupons or other debts at any particular place
other than the treasury of the county, nothing contained in
this section shall prevent any county commission from
causing the treasurer to place a sufficient sum at the place
where such debts shall be payable, at the time of their
maturity, to meet the same.

SB 1366 2
2. As provided in this section and in sections 50.166
and 54.140, the county treasurer's signature shall be the
only signature authorized or permitted on any bank signature
card, deposit agreement, or other authorization document for
any account maintained in a county depositary for county
funds under the treasurer's custody. No other county
official or employee shall be authorized or required to be
listed as a signer on any such account. Each county
depositary shall ensure compliance with this subsection and
shall accept county accounts only in accordance with the
signature authority established herein.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit any other county officer from maintaining a
separate account or accounts specifically authorized by
statute for the performance of that officer's official
duties.
✓